New Jersey, session 221, A1077.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this section: First responder means a law enforcement officer, paid or volunteer firefighter, paid or volunteer member of a duly incorporated first aid, emergency, ambulance, or rescue squad association, or any other individual who, in the course of that individuals employment, is dispatched to the scene of an emergency situation for the purpose of providing medical care or other assistance. 2.    a. Every case of attempted suicide or death by suicide by a first responder shall, within three business days, be reported to the Director of the Division of Mental Health Services in the Department of Human Services by the physician or medical examiner consulted, attending, or treating the case, or the administrator or administrators designee, whenever such case is presented for treatment or treated in a general hospital licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). b.    The director shall maintain a database of first responder attempted suicides and deaths by suicide.  The database shall compile data about reported attempted suicides and deaths by suicide by first responders in the State, without identifying any individuals involved. c.     The director shall annually issue a report to the Governor and the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), containing a summary of the data compiled that includes aggregate demographic information about first responders who attempt or commit suicide. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.